District of Columbia statutes.
8-1446

Punitive damages.

In addition to the damages authorized elsewhere in this subchapter, punitive damages may be awarded, if it is proved that the plaintiff’s injuries were caused by the defendant’s wanton or reckless disregard for public safety in the transportation of the gasses, explosives, and materials identified in § 8-1442.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 306, 54 DCR 794